Hawaii statutes.
§342G-84 Deposit into environmental
management special fund; distribution to counties. (a) Revenues generated
from the advance disposal fee shall be deposited into a special account in the
environmental management fund. Moneys from the special account shall be used
to fund county glass recovery programs established in accordance with the
requirements under section 342G-86; provided that no moneys shall be made
available to a county unless the county has first submitted its formally
adopted integrated solid waste management plan to the department for review.
In the event of any surplus in the special account, the department shall
recommend a reduction in the fee as deemed necessary.

(b) The department shall distribute the moneys
contained in the special account to the counties in proportion to the amount of
glass imported into each county based on the county's de facto population. The
distribution shall be in the form of direct contracts with the department as
permitted under chapters 103 and 103D or transfer of funds from the department.

(c) No more than ten per cent, in the
aggregate, of the revenue collected in any one year may be used by the
department for administrative and educational purposes and to promote glass
recovery, recycling, and reuse in Hawaii through research and demonstration
projects.

(d) All moneys distributed to the counties
under subsection (b), and not used by the counties as specified in section
342G-86, shall be returned to the State for deposit into the environmental
management special fund at the end of each annual contract period. [L 1994, c
201, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 253, §1; am L 2002, c 176, §11]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next